Hawaii statutes.
[§431K-13] Rules. The commissioner may
adopt rules under chapter 91, relating to risk retention groups as may be
necessary or desirable to carry out this chapter. [L 1987, c 180, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next